Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 12101 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
All state agencies and public schools that purchase beef in any
manner shall only purchase beef that meets the definition of
Oklahoma certified meat as defined in Section 6-214 of Title 2 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14022 JL 12/19/25

Req. No. 14022 Page 1